Ohio, session 136, HB938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 9.031 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 9.031. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public official" means a person who is elected or appointed to an office of the state or a political subdivision. (2) "Transaction" has the same meaning as in section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. (B) No person shall knowingly conduct a direct or indirect transaction of public funds to display any of the following that includes the personal name or likeness of a current public official: (1) A road sign, billboard, or other outdoor marker; (2) A sign, sticker, or decal on the exterior of a building, an outdoor fixture, or the exterior of a vehicle. (C) This section does not apply to any item described in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section to which either of the following apply: (1) It includes only the title or position of a public official and not the public official's personal name or likeness. (2) It is specifically authorized by law to include a public official's personal name or likeness. (D) Whoever violates division (B) of this section shall be punished as provided in section 3599.40 of the Revised Code. Section 2. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, as soon as practicable after the effective date of this section, the public office or agency having authority over any existing item described in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 9.031 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, that, if placed on or after the effective date of this section, would violate that section, shall remove or modify the item so that it complies with the requirements of that section. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any legally required approval or security seal that was placed on an outdoor fixture before the effective date of this section. When the seal expires, section 9.031 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, applies to the seal that replaces it. Section 3. This act shall be known as the No Free Advertising for Politicians Act.